Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2343.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Exclusion zone." A defined geographic area surrounding a plaintiff that a defendant is prohibited from entering by order or agreement as described in section 6108(a) (relating to relief).* * *12345678910111213141516171819 "GPS electronic monitoring device." A device or system that utilizes the Global Positioning System or comparable location tracking technology with real-time and interactive capabilities to determine the location of a defendant and notify designated persons, including law enforcement and the plaintiff, as applicable, if the defendant enters a court-ordered exclusion zone.* * *"Victim notification technology." A software-based system that enables a plaintiff to receive real-time notification on a mobile phone application or comparable technology when a defendant enters a court-ordered exclusion zone.* * *Section 2. Section 6108(a) of Title 23 is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(6.1) Establishing an exclusion zone.* * *(9.2) Where the court finds, from clear and convincing evidence after a hearing under this chapter, that the defendant has inflicted abuse upon the plaintiff or a child or poses a risk of abuse toward the plaintiff or a child:(i) Requiring the defendant to wear a GPS electronic monitoring device, for a period not to exceed 90 days, capable of immediately notifying law enforcement and the 20260HB2343PN3116 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defendant of a breach of a court-ordered exclusion zone.(ii) With the consent of the plaintiff, requiring that the GPS electronic monitoring device described under subparagraph (i) include victim notification technology that allows the plaintiff to receive immediate alerts if the defendant enters a court-ordered exclusion zone.(iii) Requiring the defendant to pay reasonable costs associated with the use of the GPS electronic monitoring device under this paragraph, including the costs of equipment, installation, monitoring and maintenance.* * *Section 3. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9763.1. Electronic monitoring with victim notification.(a) Authorization.--When imposing a sentence for a domestic violence offense that includes a condition prohibiting the defendant from contacting or intimidating a victim, the court may, in addition to any other lawful relief and with the consent of the victim, require the defendant to wear an electronic monitoring device with the capability to immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency, the victim and the defendant of a breach of a court-ordered exclusion zone.(b) Costs.--The defendant shall pay all reasonable costs associated with the use of the electronic monitoring device under this section, including the costs of equipment, installation, monitoring and maintenance.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Domestic violence offense." Any of the following offenses 20260HB2343PN3116 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) if committed against a family or household member:(1) Chapter 27 (relating to assault).(2) Section 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).(3) Section 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).(4) Chapter 30 (relating to human trafficking).(5) Chapter 31 (relating to sexual offenses).(6) Section 4302 (relating to incest).(7) Section 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children).(8) Section 5902(b.1) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(9) Section 6301(a)(1)(ii) (relating to corruption of minors).(10) Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).(11) Section 6318 (relating to unlawful contact with minor).(12) Section 6320 (relating to sexual exploitation of children)."Electronic monitoring system." A device or system that utilizes the Global Positioning System or comparable location tracking technology with real-time and interactive capabilities to determine the location of a defendant and notify designated persons, including law enforcement and the victim, as applicable, if the defendant enters a court-ordered exclusion zone."Exclusion zone." A defined geographic area surrounding a victim that a defendant is prohibited from entering."Family or household member." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 20260HB2343PN3116 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 6102 (relating to definitions)."Victim notification technology." A software-based system that enables a victim to receive real-time notification on a mobile phone application or comparable technology when a defendant enters a court-ordered exclusion zone.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2343PN3116 - 5 - 123456